Maryland, session 2026, HB1125.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
3–611.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) “COMMUNITY OUTREACH RADIUS” MEANS THE AREA INSIDE A
RADIUS OF 1 MILE FROM THE PROJECT FOOTPRINT.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1125*

HOUSE BILL 1125
(3) (I) “COVERED PROJECT” MEANS THE CONSTRUCTION,
INSTALLATION, OR SUBSTANTIAL ALTERATION OF PHYSICAL INFRASTRUCTURE OF
ANY CAPITAL PROJECT REQUESTED BY A UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 3–602 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT HAS THE POTENTIAL TO
CREATE MATERIAL IMPACTS ON NOISE, VISIBILITY, ENVIRONMENTAL CONDITIONS,
OR COMMUNITY CHARACTER THAT:
1. A. IS CONSTRUCTED ON PROPERTY OWNED OR
LEASED BY THE STATE; OR
B. IS FUNDED IN WHOLE OR IN PART WITH STATE FUNDS;
AND
2. A. EXCEEDS $2,000,000 IN TOTAL PROJECT COST;
OR
B. INCLUDES A STRUCTURE THAT EXCEEDS 75 FEET IN
HEIGHT.
(II) “COVERED PROJECT” INCLUDES COMMUNICATION
TOWERS, TRANSPORTATION FACILITIES, UTILITY INFRASTRUCTURE, PUBLIC
BUILDINGS, AND ENVIRONMENTAL OR PUBLIC SAFETY FACILITIES.
(III) “COVERED PROJECT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A CAPITAL
PROJECT INCLUDED IN THE ANNUAL STATE CAPITAL BUDGET AS:
1. A MISCELLANEOUS GRANT PROGRAM;
2. A LOCAL HOUSE OF DELEGATES INITIATIVE; OR
3. A LOCAL SENATE INITIATIVE.
(B) ON OR BEFORE JUNE 30 OF THE FISCAL YEAR PRECEDING THE FISCAL
YEAR IN WHICH A COVERED PROJECT IS ANTICIPATED TO BEGIN, THE UNIT OF
STATE GOVERNMENT PROPOSING THE PROJECT SHALL COMPLETE:
(1) A COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT PLAN WITH:
(I) A PLAIN LANGUAGE SUMMARY OF THE COVERED PROJECT
INCLUDING:
1. THE PURPOSE;

HOUSE BILL 1125 3
2. THE LOCATION;
3. ALTERNATIVE CONSIDERATIONS; AND
4. PROJECTED IMPACTS;
(II) THE MAP OF THE AFFECTED AREA WITHIN THE COMMUNITY
OUTREACH RADIUS;
(III) A DESCRIPTION OF ENVIRONMENTAL OR PUBLIC HEALTH
CONSIDERATIONS;
(IV) A TIMELINE FOR THE PROJECT DESIGN AND
CONSTRUCTION; AND
(V) CONTACT INFORMATION FOR PUBLIC INQUIRIES; AND
(2) COMMUNITY OUTREACH ACTIVITIES WITH EACH RESIDENCE,
BUSINESS, AND COMMUNITY ORGANIZATION LOCATED WITHIN THE COMMUNITY
OUTREACH RADIUS THAT INCLUDES:
(I) PROVIDING NOTICE BY MAIL AT LEAST 45 DAYS PRIOR TO
ANY DECISION TO APPROVE OR FINALIZE THE PROJECT;
(II) POSTING PUBLIC NOTICE ONLINE ON THE UNIT’S WEBSITE;
(III) POSTING PUBLIC NOTICE IN AT LEAST ONE LOCAL
NEWSPAPER;
(IV) CONDUCTING AT LEAST ONE PUBLIC MEETING IN THE AREA
WITH AN OPTION FOR VIRTUAL PARTICIPATION; AND
(V) ALLOWING MEMBERS OF THE PUBLIC A 30–DAY PUBLIC
COMMENT PERIOD.
(C) (1) (I) ON OR BEFORE OCTOBER 1, 2027, AND EACH OCTOBER 1
THEREAFTER, EACH UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT PROPOSING A COVERED
PROJECT SHALL SUBMIT A COMMUNITY ENGAGEMENT AND OUTREACH REPORT FOR
THE PROJECT TO THE DEPARTMENT.
(II) THE REPORT REQUIRED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH SHALL CONTAIN:

HOUSE BILL 1125
1. A SUMMARY OF OUTREACH EFFORTS;
2. THE PUBLIC COMMENTS SUBMITTED UNDER
SUBSECTION (B)(2)(V) OF THIS SECTION; AND
3. THE UNIT OF STATE GOVERNMENT’S RESPONSES AND
MODIFICATIONS TO THE PROJECT, IF ANY.
(2) ON OR BEFORE DECEMBER 1, 2027, AND EACH DECEMBER 1
THEREAFTER, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL SUBMIT A COMPILED REPORT OF THE
SUBMISSIONS REQUIRED UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION TO:
(I) THE GOVERNING BODY OF THE IMPACTED COUNTY OR
MUNICIPAL CORPORATION; AND
(II) SUBJECT TO § 2–1257 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT
ARTICLE:
1. THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY; AND
2. THE LEGISLATIVE POLICY COMMITTEE.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.